Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4107
Advisory Council on Public Guardianship;
members; terms; vacancy; officers.

The State Court Administrator shall appoint initial members
of the council for staggered terms of one, two, or three years as designated
by the State Court Administrator. All subsequent appointments shall be made
for terms of three years. Any vacancy on the council shall be filled in the
same manner in which the original appointment was made and for the duration
of the term vacated. Appointments of initial members of the council shall
be made within ninety days after January 1, 2015. The council shall select
a chairperson, a vice-chairperson, and such other officers as it deems necessary.

Laws 2014, LB920, § 7.